Louisiana, session 2026, SB251.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part B of Chapter 51 of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:3081 through 3089, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART B. CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE PROTECTION
§3081. Title
This Part shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana Critical
Infrastructure Protection Act of 2026".
§3082. Purpose
The purpose of this Part is to protect this state's critical infrastructure
by prohibiting foreign adversaries from accessing state critical infrastructure,
by assessing this state's vulnerability to sanctioned communications equipment,
Page 1 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 251 ENROLLED
and by prohibiting the use of adversary cameras and laser sensor technologies
in this state's transportation systems.
§3083. Rule of construction
This Part shall be construed and applied in a manner consistent with
federal law and shall not be interpreted or enforced to prohibit, restrict,
condition, or delay any transaction, agreement, activity, technology, software,
service, or access that has been specifically authorized, approved, licensed,
exempted, or otherwise permitted by the United States government.
§3084. Definitions
The following definitions apply in this Part unless the context indicates
otherwise:
(1) "Company" means a for-profit sole proprietorship, organization,
association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited partnership, limited
liability partnership, or limited liability company, including a wholly owned
subsidiary or majority-owned subsidiary of those entities or business
associations that exist to make a profit; or a nonprofit organization.
(2) "Critical infrastructure" means systems and assets, whether physical
or virtual, so vital to this state or the United States of America that the
incapacity or destruction of those systems and assets would have a debilitating
impact on state or national security, state or national economic security, state
or national public health, or any combination of those matters. A critical
infrastructure may be publicly or privately owned, and includes but is not
limited to any of the following:
(a) Gas and oil production, storage, or delivery systems.
(b) Water supply, refinement, storage, or delivery systems.
(c) Telecommunications networks.
(d) Electrical power delivery systems.
(e) Emergency services.
(f) Transportation systems and services.
(g) Personal data or otherwise classified information storage systems,
Page 2 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 251 ENROLLED
including cybersecurity.
(3) "Cybersecurity" means the measures taken to protect a computer,
computer network, computer system, or other technology infrastructure against
unauthorized use or access.
(4) "Domicile" means either the country in which a company is
registered or where the company's affairs are primarily completed.
(5) "Foreign adversary" means those countries listed in 15 CFR 791.4.
(6) "Foreign principal" means any of the following entities:
(a) The government or any official of the government of a foreign
adversary.
(b) A political party or member of a political party or any subdivision of
a political party of a foreign adversary.
(c) A partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other
combination of persons organized under the laws of or having its principal place
of business in a foreign adversary, or a subsidiary of such entity, that is owned
or controlled, directly or indirectly, by persons or entities of a foreign adversary
through the ownership of a majority voting interest or the power to direct
management or policies of the entity. Ownership shall not include passive
ownership of publicly traded securities that does not confer the power to direct
or influence management or operations.
(d) Any person who is not an entity described in Subparagraph (c) of this
Paragraph, who is domiciled in a foreign adversary, and is not a citizen or
lawful permanent resident of the United States or otherwise permitted by law
to perform work on critical infrastructure in the United States.
(e) Any person, entity, or collection of persons or entities, described in
Subparagraphs (a) through (d) of this Paragraph having a controlling interest
in a partnership, association, corporation, organization, trust, or any other legal
entity or subsidiary formed for the purpose of owning real property.
(7) "Office" means the Governor's Office of Homeland Security and
Emergency Preparedness.
Page 3 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 251 ENROLLED
(8) "Operational command authority" means the authority to direct,
control, or make real-time operational decisions affecting the physical
functioning, safety, or emergency response of critical infrastructure.
(9) "Significant access" means access that enables the holder to alter
physical operations, safety systems, or emergency response functions of critical
infrastructure.
(10) "Software" means any program or routine, or any set of one or
more programs or routines, which are used or intended for use to cause one or
more computers or pieces of computer-related peripheral equipment, or any
combination thereof, to perform a task or set of tasks, as it relates to state
infrastructure, or any operational software.
§3085. Prohibited access to critical infrastructure
A. A company or other entity constructing, repairing, operating, or
otherwise having significant access to critical infrastructure may not knowingly
enter into an agreement relating to critical infrastructure in this state with a
foreign principal from a foreign adversary if the agreement would allow the
foreign principal from a foreign adversary to directly or remotely exercise
operational command authority over critical infrastructure in this state.
B. A governmental entity may not knowingly enter into a contract or
other agreement relating to critical infrastructure in this state with a company
that is a foreign principal from a foreign adversary if the agreement would
allow the foreign principal from a foreign adversary to directly or remotely
exercise operational command authority over critical infrastructure in this
state.
C. Notwithstanding the provisions in Subsections A and B of this Section,
an entity or governmental entity may enter into a contract or agreement
relating to critical infrastructure with a foreign principal from a foreign
adversary country if all of the following apply:
(1) There is no other reasonable option for addressing the need relevant
to state critical infrastructure.
Page 4 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 251 ENROLLED
(2) Not entering into the contract or agreement would pose a greater
threat to the state than the threat associated with entering into the contract.
D.(1) Nothing in this Part shall apply to any transaction, agreement,
activity, technology, software, service, or access that is conducted pursuant to
and in compliance with a specific license or authorization issued by the United
States government, including but not limited to licenses or authorizations issued
by the United States Department of Homeland Security, United States
Department of the Treasury, or United States Department of Commerce, or
where such activities were previously conducted pursuant to a license or
authorization that is no longer required due to the lifting, modification,
removals, or expiration of applicable United States sanctions, executive orders,
regulations, or statutes.
(2) Intra-company shared services that do not involve a foreign
adversary company do not constitute agreements with a foreign principal so
long as ownership and operational command authority remain with a parent
company domiciled in the United States.
§3086. Prohibitions on certain software in critical infrastructure
A. All software providing operational command authority over critical
infrastructure shall not include any software produced by a company
headquartered in and subject to the laws of a foreign adversary, or a company
under the direction or control of a foreign adversary.
B. All software used in state infrastructure in operation within or serving
this state, including any state infrastructure which is not permanently disabled,
shall have all software prohibited pursuant to the provisions of this Section
removed and replaced with software which is not prohibited pursuant to the
provisions of this Section unless that software was lawfully installed prior to
August 1, 2026, and remains compliant with applicable federal law.
C. Any state infrastructure provider that removes, discontinues, or
replaces any prohibited software shall not be required to obtain any additional
permits from any state agency or political subdivision for the removal,
Page 5 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 251 ENROLLED
discontinuance, or replacement of such software as long as the state agency or
political subdivision is properly notified of the necessary replacements and the
replacement software is similar to the existing software.
§3087. Telecommunications providers in compliance with federal law
Nothing in this Part applies to any provider of an interactive computer
service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. 230, or any provider of a telecommunications
service or an information service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153, nor to any
employee, agent, or contractor acting on behalf of such provider, to the extent
that the provider is in compliance with the Secure and Trusted Communications
Networks Act of 2019, 47 U.S.C. 1601, et seq.
§3088. Electric utilities in compliance with federal law
Nothing in this Part applies to any member-owned electric cooperatives
or investor-owned utilities subject to the North American Electric Reliability
Corporation, NERC, Reliability Standards, or to any member-owned electric
cooperatives or investor-owned utility assets subject to the Nuclear Regulatory
Commission, NRC.
§3089. Enforcement; civil proceedings
The attorney general may institute civil proceedings to enforce the
provisions of this Part, including but not limited to actions against a foreign
adversary company or any other vendor, provider, distributor, or relabeler or
white-labeler of a foreign adversary technology for violations of the Unfair
Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, R.S. 51:1401 et seq.
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby directed to designate the
provisions of R.S. 51:3071 through 3080 as Part A of Chapter 51 of Title 51 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950 to be entitled, "PART A. DATABASE SECURITY BREACH
NOTIFICATION".
Section 3. It is the intent of this legislature that Venezuela not be considered a foreign
adversary unless and until a new determination is made by the United States Department of
Commerce to designate the successor regime to the Venezuelan politician Nicolas Maduro
to be a foreign adversary to the United States.
Page 6 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 251 ENROLLED
Section 4. (A) The provisions of R.S. 51:3089 as enacted by Section 1 of this Act
shall become effective on November 29, 2026.
(B) Sections 2, 3, and this Section of this Act shall become effective on August 1,
2026.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 7 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.